Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 31 Warehousemen, Bonded

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to buying, selling and storing of grain, see chapter 11 of title 11.

As to exemption of warehousemen from registration provision of Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1024

.

As to duties of warehousemen with respect to taxation of property in transit, see §

39-13-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of warehouseman or other bailee for loss of goods stored at other than agreed-upon place, 76 ALR4th 883.

§ 33-31-101.
Operation authorized; filing and execution of bond; action upon bond; additional bond.

Any warehouseman as provided by W.S.

34-17-101

through

34-17-106

may operate his business under said chapter as a bonded warehouseman upon filing a bond as herein provided in the office of the county clerk in the county wherein may be situated his principal warehouse, tanks, or other place of storage. Such bond shall run to the state of Wyoming and be in a principal sum of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), and conditioned that said warehouseman shall conduct his business in compliance with the provisions of W.S.

34-17-101

through

34-17-106

, and shall be good for a stated term of not less than one (1) year from the date thereof. Said bond shall be executed by such warehouseman as principal and by a corporate surety company authorized to transact business under the laws of the state of Wyoming as surety, or by two (2) sureties, residents of this state, who shall be severally and jointly liable on said bond and who shall each justify before said county clerk as provided in W.S.

1-1-105

. Anyone injured by reason of a violation of the conditions of said bond may bring suit thereon and recover the amount of damages sustained not in excess of the principal sum of said bond; and if said bond shall become impaired by reason of recovery of damages or for other reason during its term such warehouseman shall file an additional bond sufficient to make good such impairments.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 42-601; W.S. 1957, § 33-384; 1998, ch. 34, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 33-31-102.
Business permitted after approval and filing; renewal of bonds or new bonds.

Upon the approval and filing of said bond by the county clerk and during the term thereof while the principal sum therein is not impaired such warehouseman may conduct his business under W.S.

34-17-101

through

34-17-106

as a bonded warehouseman, and he may thereafter so continue as a bonded warehouseman by filing renewals of said bond or new bonds for stated terms of not less than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 3, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 42-602; W.S. 1957, § 33-385.